District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Early Childhood Educator Pay Scales Emergency Declaration
Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) Early childhood educators and child development facilities are essential to
providing children with foundational mental, emotional, and social skills prior to formal
schooling, while supplying a stable and reliable form of childcare for working families and a
more robust economy. Despite their importance to families’ and children’s wellbeing, early
childhood educators have historically been underpaid, affecting their ability to stay in the
profession and provide families with stable and quality childcare. To meet the needs of educators
and families alike, the Council adopted the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund
Establishment Act of 2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code §
1-325.431).
(b) The Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund (“pay equity fund”) was established
in the Fiscal Year 2022 budget to provide supplemental payments to child development facilities
to implement an Early Childhood Educator salary scale through the Early Childhood Educator
Pay Equity Program (“program”). The Fiscal Year 2025 budget necessitated reductions across
the District Government. Of the $70 million allocated to the pay equity fund in Fiscal Year 2025,
and annually over the next 4 years, 5% of the fund is allocated to administrative costs and $12
million is allocated to the DC Health Benefit Exchange Authority.
(c) In September 2024, the Early Childhood Educator Equitable Compensation Task
Force (“task force”) released a new lead and assistant teacher compensation scale based on the
Fiscal Year 2025 appropriation. These financial parameters required changes to the program
formula and salary scale to keep early childhood educator salaries comparable to District of
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Columbia Public Schools and other local education agencies in the District. The Council codified
the recommended salary scales on October 15, 2024, through emergency and temporary
legislation, and they were later made permanent through the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support
Act of 2025, enacted on September 4, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-148; 72 DCR 9825).
(d) Over the course of Fiscal Year 2025, it became apparent that the policy measures in
the legislation and the compensation scale recommended by the task force were inadequate to
alleviate financial pressures, and expenditures for the program totaled $77,342,319. The Council
appropriated additional funding to the program for Fiscal Year 2026, but it was insufficient to
cover the projected discrepancy of $9 million between program costs and appropriated funds. .
Emergency legislation is therefore needed to reduce program costs to offset the gap in funding
for the program.
(e) Therefore, there exists an immediate need to amend the Day Care Policy Act to
update the current compensation scales to ensure the District has the new, financially feasible
minimum educator salaries in place by December 31, 2025. This amendment would provide
child development facilities in the District with an updated salary structure that keeps the
program viable and within the limits established by the Fiscal Year 2026 budget.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia determines that the circumstances
enumerated in section 2 constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the Early
Childhood Educator Pay Scales Emergency Amendment Act of 2025 be adopted after a single
reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.
2